Hawaii, session 2025, HB327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that offering childcare services for public employees can significantly enhance workforce development and recruitment by attracting a broader pool of talent, improving retention through increased job satisfaction, and boosting productivity by reducing absenteeism and enabling employees to focus better on their work.  Additionally, it fosters economic security for families and contributes to community development, making it a valuable investment for public employers. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the office of the governor to establish a state childcare facility for state employees and their children. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of a state childcare facility for state employees and their children ages two and below; provided that the office of the governor may contract for services with providers and nonprofits, including the university of Hawaii. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of the governor for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________